Hawaii, session 2026, SB635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there have been many advances in the energy efficiency of lighting including light‑emitting diodes (LEDs) that are now up to eighty per cent more energy efficient than fluorescent bulbs and can last three to five times longer than fluorescent bulbs and thirty times longer than incandescent bulbs. The legislature additionally finds that Act 225, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023 (Act 225), was enacted as a declaration of the legislature's belief that LEDs are a better alternative to other lighting options because they do not contain any mercury, are more energy efficient, and are the cheaper life-cycle cost lighting option for consumers and businesses.  Act 225, codified as part VII of chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, makes it unlawful to sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in the State as a new manufactured product screw and bayonet base type compact fluorescent lamps, effective January 1, 2025, and pin‑base type compact fluorescent lamps and linear fluorescent lamps, effective January 1, 2026. The legislature further finds that the State has not moved expeditiously to implement energy efficient lighting options in state buildings, and therefore it is necessary to mandate the State to take action to meet the goals of Act 225 and other climate-forward policies. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require: (1)  All state agencies to use energy efficient lighting; (2)  The Hawaii state energy office to provide assistance and manage and review compliance, with priority to first responder facilities; and (3)  A report to the legislature regarding each state agency's use of energy efficient lighting. SECTION 2. Each state agency shall expeditiously use energy efficient lighting including replacing existing fluorescent fixtures and bulbs.  The Hawaii state energy office shall: (1)  Provide technical assistance to state agencies; provided that priority shall be given to assisting first responder facilities; (2)  With technical assistance from the department of accounting and general services, survey all state agencies for compliance with this Act and Act 225, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, by November 1, 2025; provided that priority shall be given to surveying first responder facilities; and (3)  Submit a report of the survey and any recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect January 1, 2491.